Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.190

Chapter as an alternative bond issuance method.

This chapter provides a complete, additional and alternative method for accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

[ 1989 c 279 s 20.]